Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.205

Purchase of works of art—Interagency reimbursement for expenditure by visual arts program.

The funds allocated under RCW 43.17.200, 28A.335.210, and 28B.10.025 shall be subject to interagency reimbursement for expenditure by the visual arts program of the Washington state arts commission when the particular law providing for the appropriation becomes effective. For appropriations which are dependent upon the sale of bonds, the amount or proportionate amount of the moneys under RCW 43.17.200, 28A.335.210, and 28B.10.025 shall be subject to interagency reimbursement for expenditure by the visual arts program of the Washington state arts commission thirty days after the sale of a bond or bonds.

[ 1990 c 33 s 574; 1983 c 204 s 3.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.